Tennessee, session 114, SB1783.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-50-321, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
(j)
(1) At the time of application or renewal of a driver license by an
applicant who appears at a driver license station, staff shall inquire of the
applicant whether the applicant would like to be issued a REAL ID compliant
driver license or a non-REAL ID compliant license. The applicant must be
provided a printed document that the applicant shall sign and on which the
applicant shall check a box stating whether the applicant is applying for a REAL
ID compliant driver license or a non-REAL ID compliant driver license and that
the applicant was provided the printed document as required pursuant to
subdivision (j)(2).
(2) The applicant must be provided a printed document that includes the
following information:
(A) The documents that are required to be provided by the
applicant to obtain a REAL ID compliant driver license, and the
documents that are required to be provided by the applicant to obtain a
non-REAL ID compliant driver license;
SB1783
011726
- 1 -

(B) The purposes for which a REAL ID compliant driver license
may be utilized, and the purposes for which a non-REAL ID compliant
driver license may be utilized;
(C) The alternative forms of identification in lieu of a REAL ID
compliant driver license, including a U.S. passport, that will be accepted
to fly domestically within the United States or to seek entry to a military
base, nuclear facility, or certain federal buildings; and
(D) The electronic technology incorporated into a REAL ID
compliant driver license, and the electronic technology incorporated into a
non-REAL ID compliant driver license.
(3) If the applicant elects not to apply for a REAL ID compliant driver
license, then staff shall facilitate and complete the processing of the application
for a non-REAL ID compliant driver license.
(4) The department's website must contain a prominently displayed
statement that indicates obtaining a REAL ID compliant driver license is optional.
(5) As used in this subsection (j):
(A) "Driver license" includes a photo identification license issued
under § 55-50-336 and a learner's permit;
(B) "Non-REAL ID compliant driver license" means a driver
license that is not compliant with the standards of the REAL ID Act of
2005 (49 U.S.C. §§ 30301, et seq.) and 6 CFR Part 37; and
(C) "REAL ID compliant driver license" means a driver license
that complies with the standards of the REAL ID Act of 2005 (49 U.S.C.
§§ 30301, et seq.) and 6 CFR Part 37.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011726